Indiana, session 2026, HB1025.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 36-1-3-15.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2 AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
3 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 15.6. (a) The following may not be subject
4 to a county residency requirement:
5 (1) A public defender.
6 (2) An individual employed by a public defender office or
7 agency.
8 (3) A judicial officer.
9 (4) Court personnel.
10 (5) A deputy prosecuting attorney.
11 (6) An employee of a prosecuting attorney's office.
12 (7) An emergency medical services provider (as defined in
13 IC 16-41-10-1).
14 (8) An employee of an agency or department that employs an
15 emergency medical services provider.
16 (b) This section does not apply to a chief public defender.
17 SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
EH 1025—LS 6137/DI 149

2
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Courts and Criminal Code, to
which was referred House Bill 1025, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 1, delete lines 7 through 8, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(1) A public defender.
(2) An individual employed by a public defender office or
agency.".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1025 as introduced.)
MCNAMARA
Committee Vote: yeas 12, nays 0.
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Corrections and Criminal
Law, to which was referred House Bill No. 1025, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 1, line 3, after "(a)" insert "The requirement to appropriate
an amount necessary for the operation of a prosecuting attorney's
office under IC 33-39-6-2(h) does not subject a prosecuting
attorney or an employee of a prosecuting attorney's office to any
county policy.
(b)".
Page 1, line 4, delete "requirement, unless the residency" and insert
"requirement:
(1) A public defender.
(2) An individual employed by a public defender office or
agency.
(3) A judicial officer.
(4) Court personnel.".
Page 1, delete lines 5 through 9.
Page 1, line 10, delete "(b)" and insert "(c)".
EH 1025—LS 6137/DI 149

3
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1025 as printed January 8, 2026.)
FREEMAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 8, Nays 1.
_____
REPORT OF THE PRESIDENT
PRO TEMPORE
Mr. President: Pursuant to Senate Rule 68(b), I hereby report that,
subsequent to the adoption of the Committee Report on February 12,
2026, House Bill 1025 was reassigned to the Committee on
Appropriations.
BRAY
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Appropriations, to which
was referred Engrossed House Bill No. 1025, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, line 3, delete "(a) The requirement to appropriate".
Page 1, delete lines 4 through 7.
Page 1, line 8, delete "(b)" and insert "(a)".
Page 1, run in lines 3 through 8.
Page 1, between lines 14 and 15, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(5) A deputy prosecuting attorney.
(6) An employee of a prosecuting attorney's office.
(7) An emergency medical services provider (as defined in
IC 16-41-10-1).
(8) An employee of an agency or department that employs an
emergency medical services provider.".
EH 1025—LS 6137/DI 149

4
Page 1, line 15, delete "(c)" and insert "(b)".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to EHB 1025 as printed February 13, 2026.)
MISHLER, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 0.
EH 1025—LS 6137/DI 149